nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren > Seismometer: Breedband-seismometers; Seismometers voor lange perioden; Seismometers voor korte perioden
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Meracie nástroje a snímače > Seizmometer: Širokopásmové seizmometre; Dlhodobé seizmometre; Krátkodobé seizmometre
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de mesure et détecteurs > Sismographes: Sismomètres à large bande; Sismomètres longue période; Sismomètres courte période
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Mittarit ja anturit > Seismometrit: Laajakaistaiset seismometrit; Pitkän aikavälin seismometrit; Lyhyen aikavälin seismometrit
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Merilna orodja in senzorji > Seizmometri: Širokopasovni seizmometri; Dolgo-periodni seizmometri; Kratko-periodni seizmometri
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki > Sejsmometry: Sejsmometry szerokopasmowe; Sejsmometry długookresowe; Sejsmometry krótkookresowe
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Strumenti/sensori misurazione > Sismografo: Sismometri a banda larga; Sismometri a lungo periodo; Sismometri a breve periodo
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือและเซนเซอร์การวัด > เครื่องมือตรวจวัดคลื่นแผ่นดินไหว: เครื่องมือตรวจวัดคลื่นแผ่นดินไหวแบบบรอดแบนด์; เครื่องมือตรวจวัดคลื่นแผ่นดินไหวระยะยาว; เครื่องมือตรวจวัดคลื่นแผ่นดินไหวระยะสั้น
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Mérőeszközök és érzékelők > Szeizmométer: Szélessávú szeizmométerek; Hosszú távú szeizmométerek; Rövid távú szeizmométerek
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 측정 도구/센서 > 지진계: 광대역 지진계; 장기 지진계; 단기 지진계
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber > Seismographen: Breitband-Seismographen; Langzeit-Seismographen; Kurzzeit-Seismographen
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Måleredskaber og -sensorer > Seismometre: Bredbåndsseismometre; Langtidsseismometre; Korttidsseismometre
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente de măsură și senzori > Seismograf: Seismografe în bandă largă; Seismografe perioadă lungă; Seismografe perioadă scurtă
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 測量工具和感測器 > 地震儀: 寬頻地震儀; 長週期地震儀; 短週期地震儀
en: Hardware > Tools > Measuring Tools & Sensors > Seismometer: Broadband Seismometers; Long-Period Seismometers; Short-Period Seismometers
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas e sensores de medição > Sismómetros: Sismómetros de banda larga; Sismógrafos de longo período; Sismógrafos de curto período
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler > Sismometreler: Geniş Bant Sismometreler; Uzun Periyotlu Sismometreler; Kısa Periyotlu Sismometreler
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία και αισθητήρες μετρήσεων > Σεισμογράφοι: Ευρέως φάσματος σεισμογράφοι; Σεισμογράφοι μεγάλης περιόδου; Σεισμογράφοι βραχείας περιόδου
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Công cụ đo lường & Cảm biến > Máy đo địa chấn: Máy đo địa chấn băng thông rộng; Máy đo địa chấn thời gian dài; Máy đo địa chấn thời gian ngắn
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Mjerni alati i senzori > Seizmometri: Širokopojasni seizmometri; Dugoročni seizmometri; Kratkoročni seizmometri
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Sensores e ferramentas para medição > Sismógrafo: Sismógrafo de banda larga; Sismógrafo de longo período; Sismógrafo de curto período
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 测量工具与传感器 > 地震仪: 宽频带地震仪; 长周期地震仪; 短周期地震仪
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Sensores y herramientas de medida > Sismómetro: Sismómetros de banda ancha; Sismómetros de largo período; Sismómetros de corto período
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Измерительные инструменты и датчики > Сейсмометры: Широкополосные сейсмометры; Длиннопериодные сейсмометры; Короткопериодные сейсмометры
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Měřicí nástroje a přístroje > Seismometry: Širokopásmové seismometry; Dlouhoperiodické seismometry; Krátkoperiodické seismometry
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Mätverktyg och sensorer > Seismometrar: Bredbandsseismometrar; Långtidsseismometrar; Korttidsseismometrar
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 測定機器・センサー > 地震計: 広帯域地震計; 長周期地震計; 短周期地震計
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Измервателни инструменти и сензори > Сеизмометър: Широколентови сеизмометри; Дългопериодични сеизмометри; Краткопериодични сеизмометри
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Matavimo įrankiai ir jutikliai > Seismometrai: Plačiajuosčio ryšio seismometrai; Ilgalaikiai seismometrai; Trumpalaikiai seismometrai
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Måleverktøy og sensorer > Seismometere: Bredbåndsseismometre; Langtidsseismometre; Korttidsseismometre